Tennessee, session 114, SB1479.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 41-51-301(a), is amended by
deleting the language "to provide a photo identification license" and substituting instead the
language "to provide a driver license, pursuant to title 55, chapter 50, part 3, or a photo
identification license", and adding the following language at the end of the subsection:
The department of correction shall coordinate with the department of safety to provide a
driver license only for those inmates who possess, or previously possessed prior to
incarceration, a driver license that was valid and in good standing at the time of
incarceration. An inmate whose driver license expired solely due to the period of
incarceration is deemed to possess a driver license in good standing for purposes of this
section. If an inmate does not possess a valid driver license in good standing, then the
department of correction shall instead coordinate with the department of safety to
provide the inmate a photo identification license pursuant to § 55-50-336.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 41-51-301(b)(1), is amended by
inserting the language "driver license, pursuant to title 55, chapter 50, part 3, or a" immediately
preceding the language "photo identification license".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 41-51-301(b)(2), is amended by
inserting the language "driver license or" immediately preceding the language "photo
identification license to all eligible inmates".
SB1479
010218
- 1 -

SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 41-51-301(b)(3), is amended by
inserting the language "or driver license" immediately after the language "photo identification
license".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 55, Chapter 50, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
55-50-356. Extension of driver license for inmates leaving incarceration.
(a) A person who held an unexpired Tennessee driver license upon
imprisonment in the custody of the department of correction that expired during the
person's term of imprisonment or within six (6) months after the person is discharged
from incarceration, must have the expiration date of the person's driver license extended
for a period of six (6) months after the person is released from the custody of the
department of correction.
(b) The departments of safety and correction shall enter into a data-sharing
agreement to facilitate the exchange of necessary data to carry out this section.
(c) The department of safety shall notify the license holder within three (3) days
of extension that the license holder must apply to renew the holder's driver license
pursuant to § 55-50-338.
(d) The departments of correction and safety are each authorized to promulgate
policies and rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act,
compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to implement this section.
(e) For purposes of this section, "driver license in good standing" means a driver
license that is valid and not suspended, revoked, or canceled at the time of the inmate's
incarceration. A driver license that expired solely due to the period of incarceration is
considered in good standing for purposes of this section.
- 2 - 010218

SECTION 6. The heading in this act is for reference purposes only and does not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the heading in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 7. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 010218